Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201849-1805
Required medium.

If a law of this state requires that a sworn declaration be presented in a particular medium, an unsworn declaration must be presented in that medium.

Laws 2017, LB57, § 7.